apertium-olo.olo.lexc
LEXICON NMN_NAINE/KIELINE-SG
:ne SGNOMSUF ;
:ze SG-ACC/APR/COM/GENSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
:s SGPARSUF_dU ;
%<sg%>:ze  OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES ;

LEXICON NMN_NAINE/KIELINE-PL
:ze PLNOMSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
:zi PL-GEN/COM/APRSUF_EN ;
:zi PLPARSUF_i ;
:zi PLINSSUF ;
%<pl%>:zi OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES ;

!LEXICON NMN_KIELINE
!	NMN_KIELINE-SG ;
!	NMN_KIELINE-PL ;

!LEXICON NMN_KIELINE-SG
!:ne SGNOMSUF ;
!:ze SG-ACC/APR/COM/GENSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
!:s SGPARSUF_dU ;
!%<sg%>:ze OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES ;

!LEXICON NMN_KIELINE-PL
!:ze PLNOMSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
!:zi PL-GEN/COM/APRSUF_EN ;
!:zi PLPARSUF_i ;
!:zi PLINSSUF ;
!%<pl%>:zi OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES ;

LEXICON NMN_TOINE
	NMN_TOINE-SG ;
	NMN_TOINE-PL ;

LEXICON NMN_TOINE-SG
:ine SGNOMSUF ;
:ize SG-ACC/APR/COM/GENSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
:s SGPARSUF_dU ;
%<sg%>:ize OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES ;

LEXICON NMN_TOINE-PL
:ize PLNOMSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
:izi PL-GEN/COM/APRSUF_EN ;
:izi PLPARSUF_i ;
:izi PLINSSUF ;
%<pl%>:izi OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES ;


!! ! Nominative singular in "v"
LEXICON NMN_ABRAMOV !!= * @CODE@ Abramov:Abramov
	NMN_ABRAMOV-SG ;
	NMN_ABRAMOV-PL ;

LEXICON NMN_ABRAMOV-SG
 SGNOMSUF ;
:%>%{aä%} SG-ACC/APR/COM/GENSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%>%{ui%} SGPARSUF_A2 ;
%<sg%>:%>%{aä%} OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES ;

LEXICON NMN_ABRAMOV-PL
:%>%{aä%} PLNOMSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
:i PL-GEN/COM/APRSUF_EN ;
:i PLPARSUF_i ;
:i PLINSSUF ;
%<pl%>:i OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES ;



!! !Singular suffixes
!! 
LEXICON SG-ACC/APR/COM/GENSUF-USUALLY-WEAK
 SGACCSUF_n ;
 SGAPRSUF_llUO ;
 SGCOMSUF_nke ;
 SGGENSUF_n ;
%<sg%>%<ins%>:%>n K ;

LEXICON SG-ACC/APR/COM/GENSUF
 SGACCSUF_n ;
 SGAPRSUF_llUO ;
 SGCOMSUF_nke ;
 SGGENSUF_n ;

 SGINSSUF ;

LEXICON SGACCSUF_n
%<sg%>%<acc%>:%>n K ;

LEXICON SGAPRSUF_llUO
%<sg%>:%>ll%{uy%}%{oö%} K ;

LEXICON SGCOMSUF_nke
%<sg%>%<com%>:%>nke K ;

LEXICON SGGENSUF_n
%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>n K ;

LEXICON SGINSSUF
%<sg%>%<ins%>:%^WGStem%>n K ;

LEXICON SGNOMSUF
%<sg%>%<nom%>: K ;
%<sg%>%<acc%>: K ;

LEXICON SGPARSUF_dU
%<sg%>%<par%>:%>d%{uy%} K ;

LEXICON SGPARSUF_tU
%<sg%>%<par%>:%>t%{uy%} K ;

LEXICON SGPARSUF_ttU
%<sg%>%<par%>:%>tt%{uy%} K ;


LEXICON SGPARSUF_A2
%<sg%>%<par%>:%>%{aäoeöuiy%} K ;

LEXICON SGPARSUF_U
%<sg%>%<par%>:%>%{uy%} K ;
!!€# luadi%^WGStem%^E1%>tt%{uy%}%>%{uy%}
!!€0 luaji000ttu%>u

LEXICON SGPARSUF_O
%<sg%>%<par%>:%>%{oö%} K ;


!! !Plural suffixes
LEXICON PL-GEN/COM/APRSUF_EN
%<pl%>%<gen%>:%>en K ;
%<pl%>%<com%>:%>enke K ;
%<pl%>:%>ell%{uy%}%{oö%} K ;

LEXICON PL-GEN/COM/APRSUF_N
%<pl%>%<gen%>:%>n K ;
%<pl%>%<com%>:%>nke K ;
%<pl%>:%>ll%{uy%}%{oö%} K ;

LEXICON PLINSSUF
%<pl%>%<ins%>:%>n K ;

LEXICON PLNOMSUF-USUALLY-WEAK
%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>t K ;
%<pl%>%<acc%>:%>t K ;

LEXICON PLNOMSUF
%<pl%>%<nom%>:%^WGStem%>t K ;
%<pl%>%<acc%>:%^WGStem%>t K ;

LEXICON PLPARSUF_Zero
%<pl%>%<par%>: K ;

LEXICON PLPARSUF_i
%<pl%>%<par%>:%>i K ;

LEXICON PLPARSUF_dU
%<pl%>%<par%>:%>d%{uy%} K ;

LEXICON ILLSUF_he
%<ill%>:%>he K ;

LEXICON Noun-NB-01
%<ade%>:%^WGStem%>l K ;
%<abl%>:%^WGStem%>l K ;
%<abl%>:%^WGStem%>lpäi K ;
%<all%>:%^WGStem%>le K ;
%<abe%>:%^WGStem%>tt%{aä%}h K ;
%<abe%>:%^WGStem%>tt%{aä%} K ;
%<abe%>:%^WGStem%>t%{aä%} K ;
%<ela%>:%^WGStem%>s K ;
%<ela%>:%^WGStem%>späi K ;
%<ess%>:%^WGStem%>nn%{uy%} K ;
%<ine%>:%^WGStem%>s K ;
!%<ins%>:%^WGStem%>n K ; 
%<ill%>:%>h K ;
%<tra%>:%^WGStem%>kse K ;
%<prl%>:%^WGStem%>či K ;
%<term%>:%>ss%{aä%}h K ;

LEXICON OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES
 OBLIQUE-CASES-TYPICALLY-WITH-WEAK-GRADE ;
 OBLIQUE-CASES-TYPICALLY-WITH-STRONG-GRADE ;

LEXICON OBLIQUE-CASES-TYPICALLY-WITH-WEAK-GRADE
%<ade%>:%>l K ;
%<abl%>:%>l K ;
%<abl%>:%>lpäi K ;
%<all%>:%>le K ;
%<all%>%<px3sg%>:%>lleh K ; ! More PX is needed 2015-11
%<abe%>:%>tt%{aä%}h K ;
%<abe%>:%>t%{aä%} K ;
%<abe%>:%>tt%{aä%} K ;
%<ela%>:%>s K ;
%<ela%>:%>späi K ;
%<ess%>:%>nn%{uy%} K ;
%<ine%>:%>s K ;
!%<ins%>:%>n K ; 
%<tra%>:%>kse K ;
%<prl%>:%>či K ;

LEXICON OBLIQUE-CASES-TYPICALLY-WITH-STRONG-GRADE
%<ill%>:%>h K ;
%<term%>:%>ss%{aä%}h K ;

!! !SINGULAR POSSESSA

LEXICON SGNOM/PXSP3 !!= @CODE@ adding -h
%<sg%>%<nom%>%<px3sp%>:%>h K ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Pronoun inflection
!  ---------------
!! Livvi pronouns inflect for case.


!  By default all pronouns get all number/case
!  this means that none will fail to generate
!  if the form happens to be wrong, it can be 
!  fixed by assigning the pronoun to the appropriate
!  continuation class. -FMT/TAP
LEXICON PERS_
%<prn%>%<prs%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<prs%>%<sg%>%<gen%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<prs%>%<sg%>%<com%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<prs%>%<sg%>%<par%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<prs%>%<sg%>%<all%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<prs%>%<sg%>%<abe%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<prs%>%<sg%>%<ade%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<prs%>%<sg%>%<abl%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<prs%>%<sg%>%<ill%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<prs%>%<sg%>%<ine%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<prs%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<prs%>%<pl%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<prs%>%<pl%>%<gen%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<prs%>%<pl%>%<com%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<prs%>%<pl%>%<par%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<prs%>%<pl%>%<all%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<prs%>%<pl%>%<abe%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<prs%>%<pl%>%<ade%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<prs%>%<pl%>%<abl%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<prs%>%<pl%>%<ill%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<prs%>%<pl%>%<ine%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<prs%>%<pl%>: # ;



LEXICON PERS-SG1
! minä:min
%<prs%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ä K ;
%<prs%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:un K ;
%<prs%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<com%>:unke K ;
%<prs%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<par%>:uu K ;
%<prs%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<par%>:uudani K ;
%<prs%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<all%>:ule K ;
%<prs%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<all%>:ulleni K ;
%<prs%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<abe%>:uttah K ;
%<prs%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<ade%>:ul K ;
%<prs%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:ul K ;
%<prs%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:ulpäi K ;
%<prs%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<ill%>:uh K ;
%<prs%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<ine%>:us K ;
%<prs%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:ulluo K ;

LEXICON PERS-SG2
! sinä:sin
%<prs%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ä K ;
%<prs%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:un K ;
%<prs%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<com%>:unke K ;
%<prs%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<par%>:uu K ;
%<prs%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<par%>:uudas K ;
%<prs%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<all%>:ule K ;
%<prs%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<all%>:ulles K ;
%<prs%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<ade%>:ul K ;
%<prs%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<abe%>:uttah K ;
%<prs%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:ul K ;
%<prs%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:ulpäi K ;
%<prs%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<ill%>:uh K ;
%<prs%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<ine%>:us K ;
%<prs%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:ulluo K ;

LEXICON PERS-SG3
! häi:hä
%<prs%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:i K ;
%<prs%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:nen K ;
%<prs%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<com%>:nenke K ;
%<prs%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<par%>:ndy K ;
%<prs%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abe%>:nettäh K ;
%<prs%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:nel K ;
%<prs%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:nelpäi K ;
%<prs%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<ade%>:nel K ;
%<prs%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<all%>:nele K ;
%<prs%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<all%>:nelleh K ;
%<prs%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<ill%>:neh K ;
%<prs%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<ine%>:nes K ;
%<prs%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:nellyö K ;

LEXICON PERS-PL1
! myö:m
%<prs%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:yö K ;
%<prs%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:eijän K ;
%<prs%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:eijät K ;
%<prs%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<com%>:eijänke K ;
%<prs%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<par%>:eidy K ;
%<prs%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<abe%>:eittäh K ;
%<prs%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:eil K ;
%<prs%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:eilpäi K ;
%<prs%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<ade%>:eil K ;
%<prs%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<all%>:eile K ;
%<prs%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<ill%>:eih K ;
%<prs%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<ine%>:eis K ;
%<prs%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<ela%>:eis K ;
%<prs%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<ela%>:eispäi K ;

LEXICON PERS-PL2
! työ:t
%<prs%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:yö K ;
%<prs%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:eijän K ;
%<prs%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:eijät K ;
%<prs%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<com%>:eijänke K ;
%<prs%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<par%>:eidy K ;
%<prs%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<abe%>:eittäh K ;
%<prs%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:eil K ;
%<prs%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:eilpäi K ;
%<prs%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<ade%>:eil K ;
%<prs%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<all%>:eile K ;
%<prs%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<ill%>:eih K ;
%<prs%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<ine%>:eis K ;
%<prs%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<ela%>:eis K ;
%<prs%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<ela%>:eispäi K ;

LEXICON pronouns
häi%<prn%>:hä PERS-SG3  "hän" ;
minä%<prn%>:minä PERS_  "minä" ;
minule%<prn%>:minule PERS_  "minulle" ;
minun%<prn%>:minun PERS_  "minun" ;
minuu%<prn%>:minuu PERS_  "minua" ;
minä%<prn%>%<prs%>:min PERS-SG1  "minä" ;
myö%<prn%>:m PERS-PL1  "me" ;
sie%<prn%>:sie PERS_  "" ;
sinule%<prn%>:sinule PERS_  "sinulle" ;
sinun%<prn%>:sinun PERS_  "sinun" ;
sinuu%<prn%>:sinuu PERS_  "sinua" ;
sinä%<prn%>:sin PERS-SG2  "sinä" ;
työ%<prn%>:t PERS-PL2  "te" ;
